Ohio, session 136, HB913.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3109.51, 3109.52, 3109.53, 3109.54, 3109.57, 3109.59, 3109.60, 3109.65, 3109.66, 3109.67, 3109.69, 3109.70, 3109.71, 3109.74, 3109.76, 3310.41, 3310.51, 3313.64, 3313.649, and 3313.672 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 3109.51. As used in sections 3109.52 to 3109.80 of the Revised Code: (A) "Child" means a person under eighteen years of age. (B) "Custodian" means an individual with legal custody of a child. (C) "Guardian" means an individual granted authority by a probate court pursuant to Chapter 2111. of the Revised Code to exercise parental rights over a child to the extent provided in the court's order and subject to the residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities of the child's parents. (D) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5180.50 of the Revised Code. (E) "Legal custody" and "residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities" have the same meanings as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.52. The parent, guardian, or custodian of a child may create a power of attorney that grants to a grandparent kinship caregiver of the child with whom the child is residing any of the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's rights and responsibilities regarding the care, physical custody, and control of the child, including the ability to enroll the child in school, to obtain from the school district educational and behavioral information about the child, to consent to all school-related matters regarding the child, and to consent to medical, psychological, or dental treatment for the child. The power of attorney may not grant authority to consent to the marriage or adoption of the child. The power of attorney does not affect the rights of the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child in any future proceeding concerning custody of the child or the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child and does not grant legal custody to the attorney in fact. Sec. 3109.53. To create a power of attorney under section 3109.52 of the Revised Code, a parent, guardian, or custodian shall use a form that is identical in form and content to the following: POWER OF ATTORNEY I, the undersigned, residing at ___________, in the county of __________, state of __________, hereby appoint the child's grandparentkinship caregiver, __________, residing at __________, in the county of ___________, in the state of Ohio, with whom the child of whom I am the parent, guardian, or custodian is residing, my attorney in fact to exercise any and all of my rights and responsibilities regarding the care, physical custody, and control of the child, __________, born __________, having social security number (optional) __________, except my authority to consent to marriage or adoption of the child __________, and to perform all acts necessary in the execution of the rights and responsibilities hereby granted, as fully as I might do if personally present. The rights I am transferring under this power of attorney include the ability to enroll the child in school, to obtain from the school district educational and behavioral information about the child, to consent to all school-related matters regarding the child, and to consent to medical, psychological, or dental treatment for the child. This transfer does not affect my rights in any future proceedings concerning the custody of the child or the allocation of the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child and does not give the attorney in fact legal custody of the child. This transfer does not terminate my right to have regular contact with the child. I hereby certify that I am transferring the rights and responsibilities designated in this power of attorney because one of the following circumstances exists: (1) I am: (a) Seriously ill, incarcerated,(b) Incarcerated or about to be incarcerated, (b)(c) Detained or about to be detained for an extended or indefinite amount of time by a local, state, or federal law enforcement agency, (d) Temporarily unable to provide financial support or parental guidance to the child, (c)(e) Temporarily unable to provide adequate care and supervision of the child because of my physical or mental condition, (d)(f) Homeless or without a residence because the current residence is destroyed or otherwise uninhabitable, or (e)(g) In or about to enter a residential treatment program for substance abuse, or (h) Experiencing or about to experience another circumstance that temporarily precludes my ability to fulfill a legal responsibility to provide care for the child; (2) I am a parent of the child, the child's other parent is deceased, and I have authority to execute the power of attorney; or (3) I have a well-founded belief that the power of attorney is in the child's best interest. I hereby certify that I am not transferring my rights and responsibilities regarding the child for the purpose of enrolling the child in a school or school district so that the child may participate in the academic or interscholastic athletic programs provided by that school or district. If there is a court order naming me the residential parent and legal custodian of the child who is the subject of this power of attorney and I am the sole parent signing this document, I hereby certify that one of the following is the case: (1) I have made reasonable efforts to locate and provide notice of the creation of this power of attorney to the other parent and have been unable to locate that parent; (2) The other parent is prohibited from receiving a notice of relocation; or (3) The parental rights of the other parent have been terminated by order of a juvenile court. This POWER OF ATTORNEY is valid until the occurrence of whichever of the following events occurs first: (1) I revoke this POWER OF ATTORNEY in writing and give notice of the revocation to the grandparent kinship caregiver designated as attorney in fact and the juvenile court with which this POWER OF ATTORNEY was filed; (2) the child ceases to reside with the grandparent kinship caregiver designated as attorney in fact; (3) this POWER OF ATTORNEY is terminated by court order; (4) the death of the child who is the subject of the power of attorney; or (5) the death of the grandparent kinship caregiver designated as the attorney in fact. WARNING: DO NOT EXECUTE THIS POWER OF ATTORNEY IF ANY STATEMENT MADE IN THIS INSTRUMENT IS UNTRUE. FALSIFICATION IS A CRIME UNDER SECTION 2921.13 OF THE REVISED CODE, PUNISHABLE BY THE SANCTIONS UNDER CHAPTER 2929. OF THE REVISED CODE, INCLUDING A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT OF UP TO 6 MONTHS, A FINE OF UP TO $1,000, OR BOTH. Witness my hand this ______ day of _________, _____ _____________________________________ Parent/Custodian/Guardian's signature _____________________________________ Parent's signature _____________________________________ Grandparent Kinship caregiver designated as attorney in fact State of Ohio ) ) ss: County of _______________) Subscribed, sworn to, and acknowledged before me this ______ day of _________, _____________ _____________________________________ Notary Public Notices: 1. A power of attorney may be executed only if one of the following circumstances exists: (1) The parent, guardian, or custodian of the child is: (a) Seriously ill, incarcerated,; (b) Incarcerated or about to be incarcerated; (b)(c) Detained or about to be detained for an extended or indefinite amount of time by a local, state, or federal law enforcement agency; (d) Temporarily unable to provide financial support or parental guidance to the child; (c)(e) Temporarily unable to provide adequate care and supervision of the child because of the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's physical or mental condition; (d)(f) Homeless or without a residence because the current residence is destroyed or otherwise uninhabitable; or (e)(g) In or about to enter a residential treatment program for substance abuse; or (h) Experiencing or about to experience any other circumstance that temporarily precludes the ability of the parent, guardian, or custodian to fulfill a legal responsibility to provide care for the child; (2) One of the child's parents is deceased and the other parent, with authority to do so, seeks to execute a power of attorney; or (3) The parent, guardian, or custodian has a well-founded belief that the power of attorney is in the child's best interest. 2. The signatures of the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child and the grandparent kinship caregiver designated as the attorney in fact must be notarized by an Ohio notary public. 3. A parent, guardian, or custodian who creates a power of attorney must notify the parent of the child who is not the residential parent and legal custodian of the child unless one of the following circumstances applies: (a) the parent is prohibited from receiving a notice of relocation in accordance with section 3109.051 of the Revised Code of the creation of the power of attorney; (b) the parent's parental rights have been terminated by order of a juvenile court pursuant to Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code; (c) the parent cannot be located with reasonable efforts; (d) both parents are executing the power of attorney. The notice must be sent by certified mail not later than five days after the power of attorney is created and must state the name and address of the person designated as the attorney in fact. 4. A parent, guardian, or custodian who creates a power of attorney must file it with the juvenile court of the county in which the attorney in fact resides, or any other court that has jurisdiction over the child under a previously filed motion or proceeding. The power of attorney must be filed not later than five days after the date it is created and be accompanied by a receipt showing that the notice of creation of the power of attorney was sent to the parent who is not the residential parent and legal custodian by certified mail. 5. This power of attorney does not affect the rights of the child's parents, guardian, or custodian regarding any future proceedings concerning the custody of the child or the allocation of the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child and does not give the attorney in fact legal custody of the child. 6. A person or entity that relies on this power of attorney, in good faith, has no obligation to make any further inquiry or investigation. 7. This power of attorney terminates on the occurrence of whichever of the following occurs first: (1) the power of attorney is revoked in writing by the person who created it and that person gives written notice of the revocation to the grandparent kinship caregiver who is the attorney in fact and the juvenile court with which the power of attorney was filed; (2) the child ceases to live with the grandparent kinship caregiver who is the attorney in fact; (3) the power of attorney is terminated by court order; (4) the death of the child who is the subject of the power of attorney; or (5) the death of the grandparent kinship caregiver designated as the attorney in fact. If this power of attorney terminates other than by the death of the attorney in fact, the grandparent kinship caregiver who served as the attorney in fact shall notify, in writing, all of the following: (a) Any schools, health care providers, or health insurance coverage provider with which the child has been involved through the grandparentkinship caregiver; (b) Any other person or entity that has an ongoing relationship with the child or grandparent kinship caregiver such that the other person or entity would reasonably rely on the power of attorney unless notified of the termination; (c) The court in which the power of attorney was filed after its creation; (d) The parent who is not the residential parent and legal custodian of the child who is required to be given notice of its creation. The grandparent kinship caregiver shall make the notifications not later than one week after the date the power of attorney terminates. 8. If this power of attorney is terminated by written revocation of the person who created it, or the revocation is regarding a second or subsequent power of attorney, a copy of the revocation must be filed with the court with which that power of attorney was filed. Additional information: To the grandparent kinship caregiver designated as attorney in fact: 1. If the child stops living with you, you are required to notify, in writing, any school, health care provider, or health care insurance provider to which you have given this power of attorney. You are also required to notify, in writing, any other person or entity that has an ongoing relationship with you or the child such that the person or entity would reasonably rely on the power of attorney unless notified. The notification must be made not later than one week after the child stops living with you. 2. You must include with the power of attorney the following information: (a) The child's present address, the addresses of the places where the child has lived within the last five years, and the name and present address of each person with whom the child has lived during that period; (b) Whether you have participated as a party, a witness, or in any other capacity in any other litigation, in this state or any other state, that concerned the allocation, between the parents of the same child, of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child and the designation of the residential parent and legal custodian of the child or that otherwise concerned the custody of the same child; (c) Whether you have information of any parenting proceeding concerning the child pending in a court of this or any other state; (d) Whether you know of any person who has physical custody of the child or claims to be a parent of the child who is designated the residential parent and legal custodian of the child or to have parenting time rights with respect to the child or to be a person other than a parent of the child who has custody or visitation rights with respect to the child; (e) Whether you previously have been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense involving any act that resulted in a child's being an abused child or a neglected child or previously have been determined, in a case in which a child has been adjudicated an abused child or a neglected child, to be the perpetrator of the abusive or neglectful act that was the basis of the adjudication. 3. If you receive written notice of revocation of the power of attorney or the parent, custodian, or guardian removes the child from your home and if you believe that the revocation or removal is not in the best interest of the child, you may, within fourteen days, file a complaint in the juvenile court to seek custody. You may retain physical custody of the child until the fourteen-day period elapses or, if you file a complaint, until the court orders otherwise. To school officials: 1. Except as provided in section 3313.649 of the Revised Code, this power of attorney, properly completed and notarized, authorizes the child in question to attend school in the district in which the grandparent kinship caregiver designated as attorney in fact resides and that grandparent kinship caregiver is authorized to provide consent in all school-related matters and to obtain from the school district educational and behavioral information about the child. This power of attorney does not preclude the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child from having access to all school records pertinent to the child. 2. The school district may require additional reasonable evidence that the grandparent kinship caregiver lives in the school district. 3. A school district or school official that reasonably and in good faith relies on this power of attorney has no obligation to make any further inquiry or investigation. To health care providers: 1. A person or entity that acts in good faith reliance on a power of attorney to provide medical, psychological, or dental treatment, without actual knowledge of facts contrary to those stated in the power of attorney, is not subject to criminal liability or to civil liability to any person or entity, and is not subject to professional disciplinary action, solely for such reliance if the power of attorney is completed and the signatures of the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child and the grandparent kinship caregiver designated as attorney in fact are notarized. 2. The decision of a grandparent kinship caregiver designated as attorney in fact, based on a power of attorney, shall be honored by a health care facility or practitioner, school district, or school official. Sec. 3109.54. A power of attorney created pursuant to section 3109.52 of the Revised Code must be signed by the parent, guardian, or custodian granting it and by the grandparent kinship caregiver designated as the attorney in fact. For the power of attorney to be effective, the signatures must be notarized. The child's social security number need not appear on the power of attorney for the power of attorney to be effective. Sec. 3109.57. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section and subject to sections 3109.56 and 3109.58 of the Revised Code, a parent, guardian, or custodian may create a power of attorney under section 3109.52 of the Revised Code only under the following circumstances: (1) The parent, guardian, or custodian of the child is any of the following: (a) Seriously ill, incarcerated,; (b) Incarcerated or about to be incarcerated; (b)(c) Detained or about to be detained for an extended or indefinite amount of time by a local, state, or federal law enforcement agency; (d) Temporarily unable to provide financial support or parental guidance to the child; (c)(e) Temporarily unable to provide adequate care and supervision of the child because of the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's physical or mental condition; (d)(f) Homeless or without a residence because the current residence is destroyed or otherwise uninhabitable; (e)(g) In or about to enter a residential treatment program for substance abuse; (h) Experiencing or about to experience any other circumstance that temporarily precludes the ability of the parent, guardian, or custodian to fulfill a legal responsibility to provide care for the child. (2) The parent, guardian, or custodian of the child has a well-founded belief that the power of attorney is in the child's best interest. (B) In addition to the circumstances described in division (A) of this section and subject to sections 3109.56 and 3109.58 of the Revised Code, a parent may execute a power of attorney if the other parent of the child is deceased. Sec. 3109.59. (A) A power of attorney created under section 3109.52 of the Revised Code terminates on the occurrence of whichever of the following events occurs first: (1) The power of attorney is revoked in writing by the person who created it, and that person gives written notice of the revocation to the grandparent kinship caregiver designated as the attorney in fact and to the juvenile court with which the power of attorney was filed. (2) The child ceases to reside with the grandparent kinship caregiver designated as the attorney in fact. (3) The power of attorney is terminated by court order. (4) The death of the child who is the subject of the power of attorney. (5) The death of the grandparent kinship caregiver designated as the attorney in fact. (B) Not later than five days after a power of attorney is revoked, a copy of the revocation of the power of attorney must be filed with the court with which the power of attorney is filed pursuant to section 3109.74 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.60. When a power of attorney created pursuant to section 3109.52 of the Revised Code terminates pursuant to division (A)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of section 3109.59 of the Revised Code, the grandparent kinship caregiver designated as the attorney in fact shall notify, in writing, all of the following: (A) The school district in which the child attends school; (B) The child's health care providers; (C) The child's health insurance coverage provider; (D) The court in which the power of attorney was filed under section 3109.74 of the Revised Code; (E) The parent who is not the residential parent and legal custodian and who is required to be given notice under section 3109.55 of the Revised Code; (F) Any other person or entity that has an ongoing relationship with the child or grandparent kinship caregiver such that the person or entity would reasonably rely on the power of attorney unless notified of the termination. The grandparent kinship caregiver shall make the notifications not later than one week after the date the power of attorney terminates. Sec. 3109.65. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, if a child is living with a grandparent kinship caregiver who has made reasonable attempts to locate and contact both of the child's parents, or the child's guardian or custodian, but has been unable to do so, the grandparent kinship caregiver may obtain authority to exercise care, physical custody, and control of the child including authority to enroll the child in school, to discuss with the school district the child's educational progress, to consent to all school-related matters regarding the child, and to consent to medical, psychological, or dental treatment for the child by executing a caretaker authorization affidavit in accordance with section 3109.67 of the Revised Code. (B) The grandparent kinship caregiver may execute a caretaker authorization affidavit without attempting to locate the following parent: (1) If paternity has not been established with regard to the child, the child's father. (2) If the child is the subject of a custody order, the following parent: (a) A parent who is prohibited from receiving a notice of relocation in accordance with section 3109.051 of the Revised Code; (b) A parent whose parental rights have been terminated by order of a juvenile court pursuant to Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.66. The caretaker authorization affidavit that a grandparent kinship caregiver described in section 3109.65 of the Revised Code may execute shall be identical in form and content to the following: CARETAKER AUTHORIZATION AFFIDAVIT Use of this affidavit is authorized by sections 3109.65 to 3109.73 of the Ohio Revised Code. Completion of items 1-7 and the signing and notarization of this affidavit is sufficient to authorize the grandparent kinship caregiver signing to exercise care, physical custody, and control of the child who is its subject, including authority to enroll the child in school, to discuss with the school district the child's educational progress, to consent to all school-related matters regarding the child, and to consent to medical, psychological, or dental treatment for the child. The child named below lives in my home, I am 18 years of age or older, and I am the child's grandparentkinship caregiver. 1. Name of child: 2. Child's date and year of birth: 3. Child's social security number (optional): 4. My name: 5. My home address: 6. My date and year of birth: 7. My Ohio driver's license number or identification card number: 8. Despite having made reasonable attempts, I am either: (a) Unable to locate or contact the child's parents, or the child's guardian or custodian; or (b) I am unable Unable to locate or contact one of the child's parents and I am not required to contact the other parent because paternity has not been established; or (c) I am unable Unable to locate or contact one of the child's parents and I am not required to contact the other parent because there is a custody order regarding the child and one of the following is the case: (i) The parent has been prohibited from receiving notice of a relocation; or (ii) The parental rights of the parent have been terminated. 9. I hereby certify that this affidavit is not being executed for the purpose of enrolling the child in a school or school district so that the child may participate in the academic or interscholastic athletic programs provided by that school or district. WARNING: DO NOT SIGN THIS FORM IF ANY OF THE ABOVE STATEMENTS ARE INCORRECT. FALSIFICATION IS A CRIME UNDER SECTION 2921.13 OF THE REVISED CODE, PUNISHABLE BY THE SANCTIONS UNDER CHAPTER 2929. OF THE REVISED CODE, INCLUDING A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT OF UP TO 6 MONTHS, A FINE OF UP TO $1,000, OR BOTH. I declare that the foregoing is true and correct: Signed:__________________________Date:___________________ GrandparentKinship caregiver State of Ohio ) ) ss: County of _______________) Subscribed, sworn to, and acknowledged before me this ______ day of _________, _____________ _____________________________________ Notary Public Notices: 1. The grandparent's kinship caregiver's signature must be notarized by an Ohio notary public. 2. The grandparent kinship caregiver who executed this affidavit must file it with the juvenile court of the county in which the grandparent kinship caregiver resides or any other court that has jurisdiction over the child under a previously filed motion or proceeding not later than five days after the date it is executed. 3. This affidavit does not affect the rights of the child's parents, guardian, or custodian regarding the care, physical custody, and control of the child, and does not give the grandparent kinship caregiver legal custody of the child. 4. A person or entity that relies on this affidavit, in good faith, has no obligation to make any further inquiry or investigation. 5. This affidavit terminates on the occurrence of whichever of the following occurs first: (1) the child ceases to live with the grandparent kinship caregiver who signs this form; (2) the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child acts to negate, reverse, or otherwise disapprove an action or decision of the grandparent kinship caregiver who signed this affidavit, and the grandparent kinship caregiver either voluntarily returns the child to the physical custody of the parent, guardian, or custodian or fails to file a complaint to seek custody within fourteen days; (3) the affidavit is terminated by court order; (4) the death of the child who is the subject of the affidavit; or (5) the death of the grandparent kinship caregiver who executed the affidavit. A parent, guardian, or custodian may negate, reverse, or disapprove a grandparent's kinship caregiver's action or decision only by delivering written notice of negation, reversal, or disapproval to the grandparent kinship caregiver and the person acting on the grandparent's kinship caregiver's action or decision in reliance on this affidavit. If this affidavit terminates other than by the death of the grandparentkinship caregiver, the grandparent kinship caregiver who signed this affidavit shall notify, in writing, all of the following: (a) Any schools, health care providers, or health insurance coverage provider with which the child has been involved through the grandparentkinship caregiver; (b) Any other person or entity that has an ongoing relationship with the child or grandparent kinship caregiver such that the person or entity would reasonably rely on the affidavit unless notified of the termination; (c) The court in which the affidavit was filed after its creation. The grandparent kinship caregiver shall make the notifications not later than one week after the date the affidavit terminates. 6. The decision of a grandparent kinship caregiver to consent to or to refuse medical treatment or school enrollment for a child is superseded by a contrary decision of a parent, custodian, or guardian of the child, unless the decision of the parent, guardian, or custodian would jeopardize the life, health, or safety of the child. Additional information: To caretakers: 1. If the child stops living with you, you are required to notify, in writing, any school, health care provider, or health care insurance provider to which you have given this affidavit. You are also required to notify, in writing, any other person or entity that has an ongoing relationship with you or the child such that the person or entity would reasonably rely on the affidavit unless notified. The notifications must be made not later than one week after the child stops living with you. 2. If you do not have the information requested in item 7 (Ohio driver's license or identification card), provide another form of identification such as your social security number or medicaid number. 3. You must include with the caretaker authorization affidavit the following information: (a) The child's present address, the addresses of the places where the child has lived within the last five years, and the name and present address of each person with whom the child has lived during that period; (b) Whether you have participated as a party, a witness, or in any other capacity in any other litigation, in this state or any other state, that concerned the allocation, between the parents of the same child, of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child and the designation of the residential parent and legal custodian of the child or that otherwise concerned the custody of the same child; (c) Whether you have information of any parenting proceeding concerning the child pending in a court of this or any other state; (d) Whether you know of any person who has physical custody of the child or claims to be a parent of the child who is designated the residential parent and legal custodian of the child or to have parenting time rights with respect to the child or to be a person other than a parent of the child who has custody or visitation rights with respect to the child; (e) Whether you previously have been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense involving any act that resulted in a child's being an abused child or a neglected child or previously have been determined, in a case in which a child has been adjudicated an abused child or a neglected child, to be the perpetrator of the abusive or neglectful act that was the basis of the adjudication. 4. If the child's parent, guardian, or custodian acts to terminate the caretaker authorization affidavit by delivering a written notice of negation, reversal, or disapproval of an action or decision of yours or removes the child from your home and if you believe that the termination or removal is not in the best interest of the child, you may, within fourteen days, file a complaint in the juvenile court to seek custody. You may retain physical custody of the child until the fourteen-day period elapses or, if you file a complaint, until the court orders otherwise. To school officials: 1. This affidavit, properly completed and notarized, authorizes the child in question to attend school in the district in which the grandparent kinship caregiver who signed this affidavit resides and the grandparent kinship caregiver is authorized to provide consent in all school-related matters and to discuss with the school district the child's educational progress. This affidavit does not preclude the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child from having access to all school records pertinent to the child. 2. The school district may require additional reasonable evidence that the grandparent kinship caregiver lives at the address provided in item 5 of the affidavit. 3. A school district or school official that reasonably and in good faith relies on this affidavit has no obligation to make any further inquiry or investigation. 4. The act of a parent, guardian, or custodian of the child to negate, reverse, or otherwise disapprove an action or decision of the grandparent kinship caregiver who signed this affidavit constitutes termination of this affidavit. A parent, guardian, or custodian may negate, reverse, or disapprove a grandparent's kinship caregiver's action or decision only by delivering written notice of negation, reversal, or disapproval to the grandparent kinship caregiver and the person acting on the grandparent's kinship caregiver's action or decision in reliance on this affidavit. To health care providers: 1. A person or entity that acts in good faith reliance on a CARETAKER AUTHORIZATION AFFIDAVIT to provide medical, psychological, or dental treatment, without actual knowledge of facts contrary to those stated in the affidavit, is not subject to criminal liability or to civil liability to any person or entity, and is not subject to professional disciplinary action, solely for such reliance if the applicable portions of the form are completed and the grandparent's kinship caregiver's signature is notarized. 2. The decision of a grandparentkinship caregiver, based on a CARETAKER AUTHORIZATION AFFIDAVIT, shall be honored by a health care facility or practitioner, school district, or school official unless the health care facility or practitioner or educational facility or official has actual knowledge that a parent, guardian, or custodian of a child has made a contravening decision to consent to or to refuse medical treatment for the child. 3. The act of a parent, guardian, or custodian of the child to negate, reverse, or otherwise disapprove an action or decision of the grandparent kinship caregiver who signed this affidavit constitutes termination of this affidavit. A parent, guardian, or custodian may negate, reverse, or disapprove a grandparent's kinship caregiver's action or decision only by delivering written notice of negation, reversal, or disapproval to the grandparent kinship caregiver and the person acting on the grandparent's kinship caregiver's action or decision in reliance on this affidavit. Sec. 3109.67. A caretaker authorization affidavit described in section 3109.66 of the Revised Code is executed when the affidavit is completed, signed by a grandparent kinship caregiver described in section 3109.65 of the Revised Code, and notarized. Sec. 3109.69. Once a caretaker authorization affidavit has been executed under section 3109.67 of the Revised Code, the grandparent kinship caregiver may exercise care, physical custody, and control of the child, including enrolling the child in school, discussing with the school district the child's educational progress, consenting to all school-related matters regarding the child, and consenting to medical, psychological, or dental treatment for the child. The affidavit does not affect the rights and responsibilities of the parent, guardian, or custodian regarding the child, does not grant legal custody to the grandparentkinship caregiver, and does not grant authority to the grandparent kinship caregiver to consent to the marriage or adoption of the child. Sec. 3109.70. An executed caretaker authorization affidavit shall terminate on the occurrence of whichever of the following comes first: (A) The child ceases to reside with the grandparentkinship caregiver. (B) The parent, guardian, or custodian of the child who is the subject of the affidavit acts, in accordance with section 3109.72 of the Revised Code, to negate, reverse, or otherwise disapprove an action or decision of the grandparent kinship caregiver who signed the affidavit with respect to the child, and the grandparent kinship caregiver either voluntarily returns the child to the physical custody of the parent, guardian, or custodian or fails to file a complaint to seek custody within fourteen days after the delivery of written notice of negation, reversal, or other disapproval. (C) The affidavit is terminated by court order. (D) The death of the child who is the subject of the affidavit. (E) The death of the grandparent kinship caregiver who executed the affidavit. Sec. 3109.71. When a caretaker authorization affidavit terminates pursuant to division (A), (B), (C), or (D) of section 3109.70 of the Revised Code, the grandparent kinship caregiver shall notify, in writing, the school district in which the child attends school, the child's health care providers, the child's health insurance coverage provider, the court in which the affidavit was filed under section 3109.74 of the Revised Code, and any other person or entity that has an ongoing relationship with the child or grandparent kinship caregiver such that the person or entity would reasonably rely on the affidavit unless notified of the termination. The grandparent kinship caregiver shall make the notifications not later than one week after the date the affidavit terminates. Sec. 3109.74. (A) A person who creates a power of attorney under section 3109.52 of the Revised Code or executes a caretaker authorization affidavit under section 3109.67 of the Revised Code shall file the power of attorney or affidavit with the juvenile court of the county in which the grandparent kinship caregiver designated as attorney in fact or grandparent who executed the affidavit resides or any other court that has jurisdiction over the child under a previously filed motion or proceeding. The power of attorney or affidavit shall be filed not later than five days after the date it is created or executed and may be sent to the court by certified mail. (B) A power of attorney filed under this section shall be accompanied by a receipt showing that the notice of creation of the power of attorney was sent to the parent who is not the residential parent and legal custodian by certified mail under section 3109.55 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) The grandparent kinship caregiver designated as attorney in fact or the grandparent who executed the caretaker authorization affidavit shall include with the power of attorney or the caretaker authorization affidavit the information described in section 3109.27 of the Revised Code. (2) If the grandparent kinship caregiver provides information that the grandparent kinship caregiver previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any criminal offense involving any act that resulted in a child being an abused child or a neglected child or previously has been determined, in a case in which a child has been adjudicated an abused child or a neglected child, to be the perpetrator of the abusive or neglectful act that was the basis of the adjudication, the court may report that information to the public children services agency pursuant to section 2151.421 of the Revised Code. Upon the receipt of that information, the public children services agency shall initiate an investigation pursuant to section 2151.421 of the Revised Code. (3) If the court has reason to believe that a power of attorney or caretaker authorization affidavit is not in the best interest of the child, the court may report that information to the public children services agency pursuant to section 2151.421 of the Revised Code. Upon receipt of that information, the public children services agency shall initiate an investigation pursuant to section 2151.421 of the Revised Code. The public children services agency shall submit a report of its investigation to the court not later than thirty days after the court reports the information to the public children services agency or not later than forty-five days after the court reports the information to the public children services agency when information that is needed to determine the case disposition cannot be compiled within thirty days and the reasons are documented in the case record. (D) The court shall waive any filing fee imposed for the filing of the power of attorney or caretaker authorization affidavit. Sec. 3109.76. (A) A grandparent kinship caregiver who has physical custody of a child under a power of attorney, within fourteen days after the child's parent, guardian, or custodian gives written notice of revocation of the power of attorney to the grandparent kinship caregiver and files a written notice of revocation of the power of attorney with the juvenile court or within fourteen days after removal of the child from the grandparent's kinship caregiver's home, may file a complaint under division (A)(2) of section 2151.23 or division (D) of section 2151.27 of the Revised Code seeking a determination of custody if the grandparent kinship caregiver believes that the revocation or removal is not in the best interest of the child. (B) A grandparent kinship caregiver who has physical custody of a child under a caretaker authorization affidavit, within fourteen days after a parent, guardian, or custodian terminates the affidavit by delivering a written notice of negation, reversal, or disapproval of an action or decision of the grandparent kinship caregiver or within fourteen days after removal of the child from the grandparent's kinship caregiver's home, may file a complaint under division (A)(2) of section 2151.23 or division (D) of section 2151.27 of the Revised Code seeking a determination of custody if the grandparent kinship caregiver believes that the termination or removal is not in the best interest of the child. (C) Pending a hearing and decision on a complaint filed under division (A) or (B) of this section, the juvenile court, in accordance with section 2151.33 of the Revised Code, may make any temporary disposition of any child that it considers necessary to protect the best interest of the child. (D) If a parent, guardian, or custodian revokes a power of attorney or terminates a caretaker authorization affidavit, the grandparent kinship caregiver may retain custody of the child until the fourteen-day period for filing a complaint under division (A) or (B) of this section has expired or, if the grandparent kinship caregiver files a complaint, until the court orders otherwise. Sec. 3310.41. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Alternative public provider" means either of the following providers that agrees to enroll a child in the provider's special education program to implement the child's individualized education program or an education plan developed by the school district under division (L) of this section and to which the child's parent owes fees for the services provided to the child: (a) A school district that is not the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school; (b) A public entity other than a school district. (2) "Eligible applicant" means any of the following: (a) Either of the natural or adoptive parents of a qualified special education child, except as otherwise specified in this division. When the marriage of the natural or adoptive parents of the child has been terminated by a divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment, or when the natural or adoptive parents of the child are living separate and apart under a legal separation decree, and a court has issued an order allocating the parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child, "eligible applicant" means the residential parent as designated by the court. If the court issues a shared parenting decree, "eligible applicant" means either parent. "Eligible applicant" does not mean a parent whose custodial rights have been terminated. (b) The custodian of a qualified special education child, when a court has granted temporary, legal, or permanent custody of the child to an individual other than either of the natural or adoptive parents of the child or to a government agency; (c) The guardian of a qualified special education child, when a court has appointed a guardian for the child; (d) The grandparent kinship caregiver of a qualified special education child, when the grandparent kinship caregiver is the child's attorney in fact under a power of attorney executed under sections 3109.51 to 3109.62 of the Revised Code or when the grandparent kinship caregiver has executed a caretaker authorization affidavit under sections 3109.65 to 3109.73 of the Revised Code; (e) The surrogate parent appointed for a qualified special education child pursuant to division (B) of section 3323.05 and section 3323.051 of the Revised Code; (f) A qualified special education child, if the child does not have a custodian or guardian and the child is at least eighteen years of age and less than twenty-two years of age. (3) "Entitled to attend school" means entitled to attend school in a school district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (4) "Formula ADM" has the same meaning as in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code. (5) "Preschool child with a disability" and "individualized education program" have the same meanings as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (6) "Qualified special education child" is a child who is at least three years of age and less than twenty-two years of age and who either was enrolled in the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school in any grade from preschool through twelve in the school year prior to the year in which a scholarship under this section is sought for the child or is eligible to enter school in any grade preschool through twelve or is less than twenty-two years of age in the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school in the school year in which a scholarship under this section is sought for the child and for whom any of the following conditions apply: (a) The school district in which the child is entitled to attend school has identified the child as autistic. A child who has been identified as having a "pervasive developmental disorder - not otherwise specified (PPD-NOS)" shall be considered to be an autistic child for purposes of this section. (b) The school district in which the child is entitled to attend school has developed an individualized education program under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code for the child that includes services related to autism. (c) The child has been diagnosed as autistic by a physician or psychologist. (d) All of the following apply: (i) The child is enrolled in a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school, is home educated in accordance with section 3321.042 of the Revised Code, or is a student older than compulsory school age and less than twenty-two years of age and received a home education in accordance with section 3321.042 of the Revised Code and has not received a diploma under section 3313.6110 of the Revised Code. (ii) The child has an individualized education program developed under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code that includes services related to autism. (iii) The child is still eligible to receive transition services under the child's individualized education program. (7) "Registered private provider" means a nonpublic school or other nonpublic entity that has been approved by the department of education and workforce to participate in the program established under this section. (8) "Special education program" means a school or facility that provides special education and related services to children with disabilities. (B) There is hereby established the autism scholarship program. Under the program, the department shall pay a scholarship under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to an eligible applicant upon application of that eligible applicant pursuant to procedures and deadlines established by rule of the department. Each scholarship shall be used only to pay tuition for the child on whose behalf the scholarship is awarded to attend a special education program or programs that implements the child's individualized education program or education plan and that is operated by an alternative public provider or by a registered private provider, and to pay for other services agreed to by the provider and the eligible applicant that are not included in the individualized education program or education plan but are associated with educating the child. Upon agreement with the eligible applicant, the alternative public provider or the registered private provider may modify the services provided to the child. The purpose of the scholarship is to permit the eligible applicant the choice to send the child to a special education program or programs, instead of the one operated by or for the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school, to receive the services prescribed in the child's individualized education program or education plan once the individualized education program or education plan is finalized and any other services agreed to by the provider and the eligible applicant. The services provided under the scholarship shall include an educational component or services designed to assist the child to benefit from the child's education. At the discretion of the eligible applicant, multiple alternative public providers or registered private providers may be contracted to provide services to implement an individualized education program or education plan as the eligible applicant and providers determine are necessary and associated with educating the qualified special education child. A qualified special education child shall not be limited to receiving services from a single provider for any services as identified in the individualized education program or education plan, including a single type of service. (C) Services, including intervention services, educational services, academic services, tutoring services, aide services, and other related special education services, provided through the program established under this section may be provided virtually by any of the following: (1) An educational aide or assistant who holds a valid permit issued under section 3319.088 of the Revised Code; (2) An instructional assistant who holds a valid permit issued under section 3310.43 of the Revised Code; (3) A qualified, credentialed provider in accordance with standards established by the department; (4) A teacher or substitute teacher licensed by the state board of education. (D) A scholarship under this section shall not be awarded to an eligible applicant while the child's individualized education program is being developed by the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school, or while any administrative or judicial mediation or proceedings with respect to the content of the child's individualized education program are pending. A scholarship under this section shall not be used for a child to attend a public special education program that operates under a contract, compact, or other bilateral agreement between the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school and another school district or other public provider, or for a child to attend a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code. However, nothing in this section or in any rule adopted by the department shall prohibit an eligible applicant whose child attends a public special education program under a contract, compact, or other bilateral agreement, or an eligible applicant whose child attends a community school, from applying for and accepting a scholarship under this section so that the eligible applicant may withdraw the child from that program or community school and use the scholarship for the child to attend a special education program for which the eligible applicant is required to pay for services for the child. (E) Except for development of the child's individualized education program or education plan, the school district in which a qualified special education child is entitled to attend school and the child's school district of residence, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, if different, are not obligated to provide the child with a free appropriate public education under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code for as long as the child continues to attend the special education program operated by either an alternative public provider or a registered private provider for which a scholarship is awarded under the autism scholarship program. If at any time, the eligible applicant for the child decides no longer to accept scholarship payments and enrolls the child in the special education program of the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school, that district shall provide the child with a free appropriate public education under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code. (F) A child attending a special education program with a scholarship under this section shall continue to be entitled to transportation to and from that program in the manner prescribed by law. (G) As prescribed in division (A)(2)(h) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, a child who is not a preschool child with a disability for whom a scholarship is awarded under this section shall be counted in the formula ADM of the district in which the child is entitled to attend school and not in the formula ADM of any other school district. (H) A scholarship shall not be paid under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to an eligible applicant for payment of tuition owed to a nonpublic entity unless that entity is a registered private provider. The department shall approve entities that meet the standards established by rule of the department for the program established under this section. (I) The department shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code prescribing procedures necessary to implement this section, including, but not limited to, procedures and deadlines for eligible applicants to apply for scholarships, standards for registered private providers, and procedures for approval of entities as registered private providers. The rules also shall specify that intervention services, including virtual services, under the autism scholarship program may be provided by a qualified, credentialed provider, including an educator or substitute teacher licensed by the state board of education, and shall additionally include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (1) A behavior analyst certified by a nationally recognized organization that certifies behavior analysts; (2) A psychologist licensed to practice in this state under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code; (3) An independent school psychologist or school psychologist licensed to practice in this state under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code; (4) Any person employed by a licensed psychologist, licensed independent school psychologist, or licensed school psychologist, while carrying out specific tasks, under the licensee's supervision, as an extension of the licensee's legal and ethical authority as specified under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code who is ascribed as "psychology trainee," "psychology assistant," "psychology intern," or other appropriate term that clearly implies their supervised or training status; (5) Unlicensed persons holding a doctoral degree in psychology or special education from a program approved by the department; (6) A "registered behavior technician" as described under rule 5123-9-41 of the Administrative Code working under the supervision and following the intervention plan of a certified Ohio behavior analyst or a behavior analyst certified by a nationally recognized organization that certifies behavior analysts; (7) A "certified Ohio behavior analyst" under Chapter 4783. of the Revised Code; (8) An occupational therapist or physical therapist licensed to practice in this state under Chapter 4755. of the Revised Code; (9) A speech-language pathologist licensed to practice in this state under Chapter 4753. of the Revised Code; (10) An intervention specialist who holds a valid license issued by the state board; (11) A literacy intervention specialist certified through pathways recognized by the Ohio dyslexia committee established by section 3323.25 of the Revised Code. To the extent that certification for any of the following positions is approved by the Ohio dyslexia committee under section 3323.25 of the Revised Code, literary intervention specialists may include: (a) A structured literacy dyslexia interventionist; (b) A structured literacy dyslexia specialist; (c) A certified academic language practitioner; (d) A certified academic language therapist. (12) An educational aide or assistant with a valid permit issued under section 3319.088 of the Revised Code; (13) An instructional assistant with a valid permit issued in accordance with section 3310.43 of the Revised Code; (14) Any other qualified individual as determined by the department. Supervision of a qualified, credentialed provider may be conducted virtually. (J) For billing purposes under the autism scholarship program, services provided by a teacher or substitute teacher licensed by the state board of education shall be classified as academic services and shall not be classified as aide services. The department shall use this differentiation to simplify monthly audit procedures. (K) The department shall provide reasonable notice to all eligible applicants receiving a scholarship under the autism scholarship program, alternative public providers, and registered private providers of any amendment to a rule governing, or change in the administration of, the autism scholarship program. (L) If a child qualifies for the autism scholarship program pursuant to a diagnosis under division (A)(6)(c) of this section and does not have an individualized education program that includes services related to autism, the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school shall develop an education plan for the child. (M) Not later than the thirtieth day of June each year, each alternative public provider and registered private provider enrolling students receiving autism scholarships shall submit to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, the tuition rates charged by the provider for the following school year. (N) The department shall not require an eligible applicant who applies for or receives a scholarship under this section to complete any kind of income verification regarding the student's family income. (O) The department shall maintain a list of each registered private provider and the location of that provider on its publicly accessible web site. Sec. 3310.51. As used in sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code: (A) "Alternative public provider" means either of the following providers that agrees to enroll a child in the provider's special education program to implement the child's individualized education program and to which the eligible applicant owes fees for the services provided to the child: (1) A school district that is not the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school or the child's school district of residence, if different; (2) A public entity other than a school district. (B) "Child with a disability" and "individualized education program" have the same meanings as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Eligible applicant" means any of the following: (1) Either of the natural or adoptive parents of a qualified special education child, except as otherwise specified in this division. When the marriage of the natural or adoptive parents of the student has been terminated by a divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment, or when the natural or adoptive parents of the student are living separate and apart under a legal separation decree, and a court has issued an order allocating the parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child, "eligible applicant" means the residential parent as designated by the court. If the court issues a shared parenting decree, "eligible applicant" means either parent. "Eligible applicant" does not mean a parent whose custodial rights have been terminated. (2) The custodian of a qualified special education child, when a court has granted temporary, legal, or permanent custody of the child to an individual other than either of the natural or adoptive parents of the child or to a government agency; (3) The guardian of a qualified special education child, when a court has appointed a guardian for the child; (4) The grandparent kinship caregiver of a qualified special education child, when the grandparent kinship caregiver is the child's attorney in fact under a power of attorney executed under sections 3109.51 to 3109.62 of the Revised Code or when the grandparent has executed a caretaker authorization affidavit under sections 3109.65 to 3109.73 of the Revised Code; (5) The surrogate parent appointed for a qualified special education child pursuant to division (B) of section 3323.05 and section 3323.051 of the Revised Code; (6) A qualified special education child, if the child does not have a custodian or guardian and the child is at least eighteen years of age and less than twenty-two years of age. (D) "Entitled to attend school" means entitled to attend school in a school district under sections 3313.64 and 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (E) "Formula ADM" has the same meaning as in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code. (F) "Qualified special education child" is a child for whom all of the following conditions apply: (1) The child is at least three years of age and less than twenty-two years of age. (2) The school district in which the child is entitled to attend school, or the child's school district of residence if different, has identified the child as a child with a disability. (3) The school district in which the child is entitled to attend school, or the child's school district of residence if different, has developed an individualized education program under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code for the child. (4) The child meets one of the following conditions: (a) Was enrolled in the schools of the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school in any grade from preschool through twelve in the school year prior to the school year in which a scholarship is sought for the child; (b) Is eligible to enter school in any grade preschool through twelve in the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school in the school year in which a scholarship is sought for the child; (c) All of the following apply: (i) The child is at least eighteen years of age and less than twenty-two years of age. (ii) The child is enrolled in a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school, is home educated in accordance with section 3321.042 of the Revised Code, or is a student older than compulsory school age and less than twenty-two years of age and received a home education in accordance with section 3321.042 of the Revised Code and has not received a diploma under section 3313.6110 of the Revised Code. (iii) The child is still eligible to receive transition services under the child's individualized education program. (5) The department of education and workforce has not approved a scholarship for the child under the educational choice scholarship pilot program, under sections 3310.01 to 3310.17 of the Revised Code, the autism scholarship program, under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code, or the pilot project scholarship program, under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code for the same school year in which a scholarship under the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program is sought. (6) The child and the child's parents are in compliance with the state compulsory attendance law under Chapter 3321. of the Revised Code. (G) "Registered private provider" means a nonpublic school or other nonpublic entity that has been registered by the superintendent of public instruction under section 3310.58 of the Revised Code prior to October 3, 2023, or the department of education and workforce on or after that date. (H) "Scholarship" means a scholarship awarded under the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program pursuant to sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. (I) "School district of residence" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code is not a "school district of residence" for purposes of sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. (J) "School year" has the same meaning as in section 3313.62 of the Revised Code. (K) "Special education program" means a school or facility that provides special education and related services to children with disabilities. Sec. 3313.64. (A) As used in this section and in section 3313.65 of the Revised Code: (1)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(1)(b) of this section, "parent" means either parent, unless the parents are separated or divorced or their marriage has been dissolved or annulled, in which case "parent" means the parent who is the residential parent and legal custodian of the child. When a child is in the legal custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent, "parent" means the parent with residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities. When a child is in the permanent custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent, "parent" means the parent who was divested of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child and the right to have the child live with the parent and be the legal custodian of the child and all residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities. (b) When a child is the subject of a power of attorney executed under sections 3109.51 to 3109.62 of the Revised Code, "parent""Parent" means the grandparent designated as a child's kinship caregiver when the kinship caregiver is the attorney in fact under the a power of attorney. When a child is the subject of executed under sections 3109.51 to 3109.62 of the Revised Code or has executed a caretaker authorization affidavit executed under sections 3109.64 3109.65 to 3109.73 of the Revised Code, "parent" means the grandparent that executed the affidavit. (2) "Legal custody," "permanent custody," and "residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities" have the same meanings as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. (3) "School district" or "district" means a city, local, or exempted village school district and excludes any school operated in an institution maintained by the department of youth services. (4) Except as used in division (C)(2) of this section, "home" means a home, institution, foster home, group home, or other residential facility in this state that receives and cares for children, to which any of the following applies: (a) The home is licensed, certified, or approved for such purpose by the state or is maintained by the department of youth services. (b) The home is operated by a person who is licensed, certified, or approved by the state to operate the home for such purpose. (c) The home accepted the child through a placement by a person licensed, certified, or approved to place a child in such a home by the state. (d) The home is a children's home created under section 5153.21 or 5153.36 of the Revised Code. (5) "Agency" means all of the following: (a) A public children services agency; (b) An organization that holds a certificate issued by the department of children and youth in accordance with the requirements of section 5103.03 of the Revised Code and assumes temporary or permanent custody of children through commitment, agreement, or surrender, and places children in family homes for the purpose of adoption; (c) Comparable agencies of other states or countries that have complied with applicable requirements of section 2151.39 of the Revised Code or as applicable, sections 5103.20 to 5103.22 or 5103.23 to 5103.237 of the Revised Code. (6) A child is placed for adoption if either of the following occurs: (a) An agency to which the child has been permanently committed or surrendered enters into an agreement with a person pursuant to section 5103.16 of the Revised Code for the care and adoption of the child. (b) The child's natural parent places the child pursuant to section 5103.16 of the Revised Code with a person who will care for and adopt the child. (7) "Preschool child with a disability" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Child," unless otherwise indicated, includes preschool children with disabilities. (9) "Active duty" means active duty pursuant to an executive order of the president of the United States, an act of the congress of the United States, or section 5919.29 or 5923.21 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as otherwise provided in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code for admittance to kindergarten and first grade, a child who is at least five but under twenty-two years of age and any preschool child with a disability shall be admitted to school as provided in this division. (1) A child shall be admitted to the schools of the school district in which the child's parent resides. (2) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section or division (B) of section 2151.362 and section 3317.30 of the Revised Code, a child who does not reside in the district where the child's parent resides shall be admitted to the schools of the district in which the child resides if any of the following applies: (a) The child is in the legal or permanent custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent. (b) The child resides in a home. (c) The child requires special education. (3) A child who is not entitled under division (B)(2) of this section to be admitted to the schools of the district where the child resides and who is residing with a resident of this state with whom the child has been placed for adoption shall be admitted to the schools of the district where the child resides unless either of the following applies: (a) The placement for adoption has been terminated. (b) Another school district is required to admit the child under division (B)(1) of this section. (4)(a) A child who does not reside in the district where the child's parent resides is not required to be admitted to the schools of the district in which the child resides if both of the following apply: (i) The child resides in a home, or in a facility similarly licensed in another state, and the child was placed in the home or facility by the child's parent in consultation with, and upon the recommendation of, the Ohio resilience through integrated systems and excellence program for children and youth involved in multiple state systems. (ii) The home provides education services that meet the minimum education standards under division (D)(2) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code or, in the case of a facility located in another state, meets substantially similar requirements of the jurisdiction where the facility is located, except that the home or facility may provide the child with less than the minimum number of instructional hours required only as necessary to accommodate the child's treatment program. (b) Upon a child's admission to a home pursuant to division (B)(4)(a) of this section, the home shall notify the district where the child's parent resides and the district where the home is located that the home is providing educational services to the child until the child is discharged. Upon a child's admission to a facility located in another state pursuant to division (B)(4)(a) of this section, the facility shall notify the district where the child's parent resides that the facility is providing educational services to the child until the child is discharged. In either case, the district where the child's parent resides shall continue to enroll the student as provided in division (C)(5) of this section and shall excuse the child from attendance until the child is discharged from the home or facility. (c) Upon a child's discharge from a home or facility, the home or facility shall notify the district where the child's parent resides. The home or facility and the district shall collaborate on a supportive reentry plan into school for the child. Division (B) of this section does not prohibit the board of education of a school district from placing a child with a disability who resides in the district in a special education program outside of the district or its schools in compliance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code. (C) A district shall not charge tuition for children admitted under division (B)(1) or (3) of this section. If the district admits a child under division (B)(2) of this section, tuition shall be paid to the district that admits the child as provided in divisions (C)(1) to (3) of this section, unless division (C)(4) of this section applies to the child: (1) If the child receives special education in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, the school district of residence, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, shall pay tuition for the child in accordance with section 3323.091, 3323.13, 3323.14, or 3323.141 of the Revised Code regardless of who has custody of the child or whether the child resides in a home. (2) For a child that does not receive special education in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, except as otherwise provided in division (C)(2)(d) of this section, if the child is in the permanent or legal custody of a government agency or person other than the child's parent, tuition shall be paid by: (a) The district in which the child's parent resided at the time the court removed the child from home or at the time the court vested legal or permanent custody of the child in the person or government agency, whichever occurred first; (b) If the parent's residence at the time the court removed the child from home or placed the child in the legal or permanent custody of the person or government agency is unknown, tuition shall be paid by the district in which the child resided at the time the child was removed from home or placed in legal or permanent custody, whichever occurred first; (c) If a school district cannot be established under division (C)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, tuition shall be paid by the district determined as required by section 2151.362 of the Revised Code by the court at the time it vests custody of the child in the person or government agency; (d) If at the time the court removed the child from home or vested legal or permanent custody of the child in the person or government agency, whichever occurred first, one parent was in a residential or correctional facility or a juvenile residential placement and the other parent, if living and not in such a facility or placement, was not known to reside in this state, tuition shall be paid by the district determined under division (D) of section 3313.65 of the Revised Code as the district required to pay any tuition while the parent was in such facility or placement; (e) If the department of education and workforce has determined, pursuant to division (A)(2) of section 2151.362 of the Revised Code, that a school district other than the one named in the court's initial order, or in a prior determination of the department, is responsible to bear the cost of educating the child, the district so determined shall be responsible for that cost. (3) If the child is not in the permanent or legal custody of a government agency or person other than the child's parent and the child resides in a home, tuition shall be paid by one of the following: (a) The school district in which the child's parent resides; (b) If the child's parent is not a resident of this state, the home in which the child resides. (4) Division (C)(4) of this section applies to any child who is admitted to a school district under division (B)(2) of this section, resides in a home that is not a foster home, a home maintained by the department of youth services, a detention facility established under section 2152.41 of the Revised Code, or a juvenile facility established under section 2151.65 of the Revised Code, and receives educational services at the home or facility in which the child resides pursuant to a contract between the home or facility and the school district providing those services. If a child to whom division (C)(4) of this section applies is a special education student, a district may choose whether to receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section or to receive a payment for that child under section 3323.14 of the Revised Code. If a district chooses to receive a payment for that child under section 3323.14 of the Revised Code, it shall not receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section. If a child to whom division (C)(4) of this section applies is not a special education student, a district shall receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section. In the case of a child to which division (C)(4) of this section applies, the total educational cost to be paid for the child shall be determined by a formula approved by the department of education and workforce, which formula shall be designed to calculate a per diem cost for the educational services provided to the child for each day the child is served and shall reflect the total actual cost incurred in providing those services. The department shall certify the total educational cost to be paid for the child to both the school district providing the educational services and, if different, the school district that is responsible to pay tuition for the child. The department shall deduct the certified amount from the state basic aid funds payable under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code to the district responsible to pay tuition and shall pay that amount to the district providing the educational services to the child. (5) In the case of a child to whom division (B)(4) of this section applies, and except as otherwise provided in division (C)(5)(f) of this section, tuition shall be paid to the home or facility for educational services provided to the child by the school district in which the child's parent resides according to the following: (a) The total educational cost to be paid for the child shall be determined by a formula approved by the department of education and workforce. The department shall design the formula to calculate a per diem cost for the educational services provided to the child for each day the child is served and shall reflect the total actual cost incurred in providing those services. The department shall certify the total educational cost to be paid for the child to both the home or facility providing the educational services and the district that is responsible to pay the tuition for the child. The department shall deduct the certified amount from the state basic aid funds payable under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code to the district responsible to pay tuition and shall pay that amount to the home or facility providing the educational services to the child. (b) The district responsible to pay tuition shall continue to report the child in its enrollment for purposes of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (c) If the parent's residence changes to a different school district while the child resides in the home or facility, the department of education and workforce may re-determine the school district responsible for tuition based on evidence provided by the district currently responsible for tuition. (d) Upon a child's discharge from the home or facility, the home or facility shall immediately notify the district where the child's parent resides and the department of education and workforce. The notification shall include a certified transcript of all coursework completed by the child while residing in the home or facility. The district where the child's parent resides shall accept all coursework completed by the child while in the home or facility and shall award credit for that coursework in accordance with district policy. (e) Following discharge from the home or facility and return to the parent's residence, high school students shall meet requirements under section 3313.618 of the Revised Code in order to qualify for a high school diploma that are no more stringent than those that apply to students who enroll into an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school after receiving a home education under section 3321.042 of the Revised Code. (f) If the child is provided educational services by a chartered nonpublic school while residing in a home and the child has been awarded a scholarship under a state scholarship program, as defined in section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, no school district shall be responsible for paying tuition under division (C)(5) of this section. (D) Tuition required to be paid under divisions (C)(2) and (3)(a) of this section shall be computed in accordance with section 3317.08 of the Revised Code. Tuition required to be paid under division (C)(3)(b) of this section shall be computed in accordance with section 3317.081 of the Revised Code. If a home fails to pay the tuition required by division (C)(3)(b) of this section, the board of education providing the education may recover in a civil action the tuition and the expenses incurred in prosecuting the action, including court costs and reasonable attorney's fees. If the prosecuting attorney or city director of law represents the board in such action, costs and reasonable attorney's fees awarded by the court, based upon the prosecuting attorney's, director's, or one of their designee's time spent preparing and presenting the case, shall be deposited in the county or city general fund. (E) A board of education may enroll a child free of any tuition obligation for a period not to exceed sixty days, on the sworn statement of an adult resident of the district that the resident has initiated legal proceedings for custody of the child. (F) In the case of any individual entitled to attend school under this division, no tuition shall be charged by the school district of attendance and no other school district shall be required to pay tuition for the individual's attendance. Notwithstanding division (B), (C), or (E) of this section: (1) All persons at least eighteen but under twenty-two years of age who live apart from their parents, support themselves by their own labor, and have not successfully completed the high school curriculum or the individualized education program developed for the person by the high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code, are entitled to attend school in the district in which they reside. (2) Any child under eighteen years of age who is married is entitled to attend school in the child's district of residence. (3) A child is entitled to attend school in the district in which either of the child's parents is employed if the child has a medical condition that may require emergency medical attention. The parent of a child entitled to attend school under division (F)(3) of this section shall submit to the board of education of the district in which the parent is employed a statement from the child's physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner certifying that the child's medical condition may require emergency medical attention. The statement shall be supported by such other evidence as the board may require. (4) Any child residing with a person other than the child's parent is entitled, for a period not to exceed twelve months, to attend school in the district in which that person resides if the child's parent files an affidavit with the superintendent of the district in which the person with whom the child is living resides stating all of the following: (a) That the parent is serving outside of the state in the armed services of the United States; (b) That the parent intends to reside in the district upon returning to this state; (c) The name and address of the person with whom the child is living while the parent is outside the state. (5) Any child under the age of twenty-two years who, after the death of a parent, resides in a school district other than the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parent's death is entitled to continue to attend school in the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parent's death for the remainder of the school year, subject to approval of that district board. (6) A child under the age of twenty-two years who resides with a parent who is having a new house built in a school district outside the district where the parent is residing is entitled to attend school for a period of time in the district where the new house is being built. In order to be entitled to such attendance, the parent shall provide the district superintendent with the following: (a) A sworn statement explaining the situation, revealing the location of the house being built, and stating the parent's intention to reside there upon its completion; (b) A statement from the builder confirming that a new house is being built for the parent and that the house is at the location indicated in the parent's statement. (7) A child under the age of twenty-two years residing with a parent who has a contract to purchase a house in a school district outside the district where the parent is residing and who is waiting upon the date of closing of the mortgage loan for the purchase of such house is entitled to attend school for a period of time in the district where the house is being purchased. In order to be entitled to such attendance, the parent shall provide the district superintendent with the following: (a) A sworn statement explaining the situation, revealing the location of the house being purchased, and stating the parent's intent to reside there; (b) A statement from a real estate broker or bank officer confirming that the parent has a contract to purchase the house, that the parent is waiting upon the date of closing of the mortgage loan, and that the house is at the location indicated in the parent's statement. The district superintendent shall establish a period of time not to exceed ninety days during which the child entitled to attend school under division (F)(6) or (7) of this section may attend without tuition obligation. A student attending a school under division (F)(6) or (7) of this section shall be eligible to participate in interscholastic athletics under the auspices of that school, provided the board of education of the school district where the student's parent resides, by a formal action, releases the student to participate in interscholastic athletics at the school where the student is attending, and provided the student receives any authorization required by a public agency or private organization of which the school district is a member exercising authority over interscholastic sports. (8) A child whose parent is a full-time employee of a city, local, or exempted village school district, or of an educational service center, may be admitted to the schools of the district where the child's parent is employed, or in the case of a child whose parent is employed by an educational service center, in the district that serves the location where the parent's job is primarily located, provided the district board of education establishes such an admission policy by resolution adopted by a majority of its members. Any such policy shall take effect on the first day of the school year and the effective date of any amendment or repeal may not be prior to the first day of the subsequent school year. The policy shall be uniformly applied to all such children and shall provide for the admission of any such child upon request of the parent. No child may be admitted under this policy after the first day of classes of any school year. (9) A child who is with the child's parent under the care of a shelter for victims of domestic violence, as defined in section 3113.33 of the Revised Code, is entitled to attend school free in the district in which the child is with the child's parent, and no other school district shall be required to pay tuition for the child's attendance in that school district. The enrollment of a child in a school district under this division shall not be denied due to a delay in the school district's receipt of any records required under section 3313.672 of the Revised Code or any other records required for enrollment. Any days of attendance and any credits earned by a child while enrolled in a school district under this division shall be transferred to and accepted by any school district in which the child subsequently enrolls. The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules to ensure compliance with this division. (10) Any child under the age of twenty-two years whose parent has moved out of the school district after the commencement of classes in the child's senior year of high school is entitled, subject to the approval of that district board, to attend school in the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parental move for the remainder of the school year and for one additional semester or equivalent term. A district board may also adopt a policy specifying extenuating circumstances under which a student may continue to attend school under division (F)(10) of this section for an additional period of time in order to successfully complete the high school curriculum for the individualized education program developed for the student by the high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code. (11) As used in this division, "grandparent" means a parent of a parent of a child. A child under the age of twenty-two years who is in the custody of the child's parent, resides with a grandparent, and does not require special education is entitled to attend the schools of the district in which the child's grandparent resides, provided that, prior to such attendance in any school year, the board of education of the school district in which the child's grandparent resides and the board of education of the school district in which the child's parent resides enter into a written agreement specifying that good cause exists for such attendance, describing the nature of this good cause, and consenting to such attendance. In lieu of a consent form signed by a parent, a board of education may request the grandparent of a child attending school in the district in which the grandparent resides pursuant to division (F)(11) of this section to complete any consent form required by the district, including any authorization required by sections 3313.712, 3313.713, 3313.716, and 3313.718 of the Revised Code. Upon request, the grandparent shall complete any consent form required by the district. A school district shall not incur any liability solely because of its receipt of a consent form from a grandparent in lieu of a parent. Division (F)(11) of this section does not create, and shall not be construed as creating, a new cause of action or substantive legal right against a school district, a member of a board of education, or an employee of a school district. This section does not affect, and shall not be construed as affecting, any immunities from defenses to tort liability created or recognized by Chapter 2744. of the Revised Code for a school district, member, or employee. (12) A child under the age of twenty-two years is entitled to attend school in a school district other than the district in which the child is entitled to attend school under division (B), (C), or (E) of this section provided that, prior to such attendance in any school year, both of the following occur: (a) The superintendent of the district in which the child is entitled to attend school under division (B), (C), or (E) of this section contacts the superintendent of another district for purposes of this division; (b) The superintendents of both districts enter into a written agreement that consents to the attendance and specifies that the purpose of such attendance is to protect the student's physical or mental well-being or to deal with other extenuating circumstances deemed appropriate by the superintendents. While an agreement is in effect under this division for a student who is not receiving special education under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code and notwithstanding Chapter 3327. of the Revised Code, the board of education of neither school district involved in the agreement is required to provide transportation for the student to and from the school where the student attends. A student attending a school of a district pursuant to this division shall be allowed to participate in all student activities, including interscholastic athletics, at the school where the student is attending on the same basis as any student who has always attended the schools of that district while of compulsory school age. (13) All school districts shall comply with the "McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act," 42 U.S.C.A. 11431 et seq., for the education of homeless children. Each city, local, and exempted village school district shall comply with the requirements of that act governing the provision of a free, appropriate public education, including public preschool, to each homeless child. When a child loses permanent housing and becomes a homeless person, as defined in 42 U.S.C.A. 11481(5), or when a child who is such a homeless person changes temporary living arrangements, the child's parent or guardian shall have the option of enrolling the child in either of the following: (a) The child's school of origin, as defined in 42 U.S.C.A. 11432(g)(3)(C); (b) The school that is operated by the school district in which the shelter where the child currently resides is located and that serves the geographic area in which the shelter is located. (14) A child under the age of twenty-two years who resides with a person other than the child's parent is entitled to attend school in the school district in which that person resides if both of the following apply: (a) That person has been appointed, through a military power of attorney executed under section 574(a) of the "National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 1994," 107 Stat. 1674 (1993), 10 U.S.C. 1044b, or through a comparable document necessary to complete a family care plan, as the parent's agent for the care, custody, and control of the child while the parent is on active duty as a member of the national guard or a reserve unit of the armed forces of the United States or because the parent is a member of the armed forces of the United States and is on a duty assignment away from the parent's residence. (b) The military power of attorney or comparable document includes at least the authority to enroll the child in school. The entitlement to attend school in the district in which the parent's agent under the military power of attorney or comparable document resides applies until the end of the school year in which the military power of attorney or comparable document expires. (G) A board of education, after approving admission, may waive tuition for students who will temporarily reside in the district and who are either of the following: (1) Residents or domiciliaries of a foreign nation who request admission as foreign exchange students; (2) Residents or domiciliaries of the United States but not of Ohio who request admission as participants in an exchange program operated by a student exchange organization. (H) Pursuant to sections 3311.211, 3313.90, 3319.01, 3323.04, 3327.04, and 3327.06 of the Revised Code, a child may attend school or participate in a special education program in a school district other than in the district where the child is entitled to attend school under division (B) of this section. (I)(1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code, a child under twenty-two years of age may attend school in the school district in which the child, at the end of the first full week of October of the school year, was entitled to attend school as otherwise provided under this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code, if at that time the child was enrolled in the schools of the district but since that time the child or the child's parent has relocated to a new address located outside of that school district and within the same county as the child's or parent's address immediately prior to the relocation. The child may continue to attend school in the district, and at the school to which the child was assigned at the end of the first full week of October of the current school year, for the balance of the school year. Division (I)(1) of this section applies only if both of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) The board of education of the school district in which the child was entitled to attend school at the end of the first full week in October and of the district to which the child or child's parent has relocated each has adopted a policy to enroll children described in division (I)(1) of this section. (b) The child's parent provides written notification of the relocation outside of the school district to the superintendent of each of the two school districts. (2) At the beginning of the school year following the school year in which the child or the child's parent relocated outside of the school district as described in division (I)(1) of this section, the child is not entitled to attend school in the school district under that division. (3) Any person or entity owing tuition to the school district on behalf of the child at the end of the first full week in October, as provided in division (C) of this section, shall continue to owe such tuition to the district for the child's attendance under division (I)(1) of this section for the lesser of the balance of the school year or the balance of the time that the child attends school in the district under division (I)(1) of this section. (4) A pupil who may attend school in the district under division (I)(1) of this section shall be entitled to transportation services pursuant to an agreement between the district and the district in which the child or child's parent has relocated unless the districts have not entered into such agreement, in which case the child shall be entitled to transportation services in the same manner as a pupil attending school in the district under interdistrict open enrollment as described in division (E) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the district has adopted an open enrollment policy as described in division (B)(1)(b) or (c) of section 3313.98 of the Revised Code. (J) This division does not apply to a child receiving special education. A school district required to pay tuition pursuant to division (C)(2) or (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code shall have an amount deducted under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code equal to its own tuition rate for the same period of attendance. A school district entitled to receive tuition pursuant to division (C)(2) or (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code shall have an amount credited under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code equal to its own tuition rate for the same period of attendance. If the tuition rate credited to the district of attendance exceeds the rate deducted from the district required to pay tuition, the department of education and workforce shall pay the district of attendance the difference from amounts deducted from all districts' payments under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code but not credited to other school districts under such division and from appropriations made for such purpose. The treasurer of each school district shall, by the fifteenth day of January and July, furnish the director of education and workforce a report of the names of each child who attended the district's schools under divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code during the preceding six calendar months, the duration of the attendance of those children, the school district responsible for tuition on behalf of the child, and any other information that the director requires. Upon receipt of the report the director, pursuant to division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, shall deduct each district's tuition obligations under divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code and pay to the district of attendance that amount plus any amount required to be paid by the state. (K) In the event of a disagreement, the director of education and workforce shall determine the school district in which the parent resides. (L) Nothing in this section requires or authorizes, or shall be construed to require or authorize, the admission to a public school in this state of a pupil who has been permanently excluded from public school attendance by the director pursuant to sections 3301.121 and 3313.662 of the Revised Code. (M) In accordance with division (B)(1) of this section, a child whose parent is a member of the national guard or a reserve unit of the armed forces of the United States and is called to active duty, or a child whose parent is a member of the armed forces of the United States and is ordered to a temporary duty assignment outside of the district, may continue to attend school in the district in which the child's parent lived before being called to active duty or ordered to a temporary duty assignment outside of the district, as long as the child's parent continues to be a resident of that district, and regardless of where the child lives as a result of the parent's active duty status or temporary duty assignment. However, the district is not responsible for providing transportation for the child if the child lives outside of the district as a result of the parent's active duty status or temporary duty assignment. Sec. 3313.649. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Power of attorney" means a power of attorney created under section 3109.52 of the Revised Code. (2) "Caretaker authorization affidavit" means an affidavit executed under section 3109.67 of the Revised Code. (B) The grandparent kinship caregiver who is the attorney in fact under a power of attorney or the grandparent that who executed a caretaker authorization affidavit may enroll the child who is the subject of the power of attorney or affidavit in a school in the school district in which the grandparent kinship caregiver resides. Unless another reason exists under the Revised Code to exclude the child, the child may attend the schools of the school district in which the grandparent kinship caregiver resides. Sec. 3313.672. (A)(1) At the time of initial entry to a public or nonpublic school, a pupil shall present to the person in charge of admission any records given the pupil by the public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school the pupil most recently attended; a certified copy of an order or decree, or modification of such an order or decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of a child and designating a residential parent and legal custodian of the child, as provided in division (B) of this section, if that type of order or decree has been issued; a copy of a power of attorney or caretaker authorization affidavit, if either has been executed with respect to the child pursuant to sections 3109.51 to 3109.80 of the Revised Code; and a certification of birth issued pursuant to Chapter 3705. of the Revised Code, a comparable certificate or certification issued pursuant to the statutes of another state, territory, possession, or nation, or a document in lieu of a certificate or certification as described in divisions (A)(1)(a) to (e) of this section. Any of the following shall be accepted in lieu of a certificate or certification of birth by the person in charge of admission: (a) A passport or attested transcript of a passport filed with a registrar of passports at a point of entry of the United States showing the date and place of birth of the child; (b) An attested transcript of the certificate of birth; (c) An attested transcript of the certificate of baptism or other religious record showing the date and place of birth of the child; (d) An attested transcript of a hospital record showing the date and place of birth of the child; (e) A birth affidavit. (2) If a pupil requesting admission to a school of the school district in which the pupil is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code has been discharged or released from the custody of the department of youth services under section 5139.51 of the Revised Code just prior to requesting admission to the school, no school official shall admit that pupil until the records described in divisions (D)(4)(a) to (d) of section 2152.18 of the Revised Code have been received by the superintendent of the school district. (3) No public or nonpublic school official shall deny a protected child admission to the school solely because the child does not present a birth certificate described in division (A)(1) of this section, a comparable certificate or certification from another state, territory, possession, or nation, or another document specified in divisions (A)(1)(a) to (e) of this section upon registration for entry into the school. However, the protected child, or the parent, custodian, or guardian of that child, shall present a birth certificate or other document specified in divisions (A)(1)(a) to (e) of this section to the person in charge of admission of the school within ninety days after the child's initial entry into the school. (4) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2) or (3) of this section, within twenty-four hours of the entry into the school of a pupil described in division (A)(1) of this section, a school official shall request the pupil's official records from the public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school the pupil most recently attended. If the public or nonpublic school the pupil claims to have most recently attended indicates that it has no record of the pupil's attendance or the records are not received within fourteen days of the date of request, or if the pupil does not present a certification of birth described in division (A)(1) of this section, a comparable certificate or certification from another state, territory, possession, or nation, or another document specified in divisions (A)(1)(a) to (e) of this section, the principal or chief administrative officer of the school shall notify the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in the area where the pupil resides of this fact and of the possibility that the pupil may be a missing child, as defined in section 2901.30 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Whenever an order or decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of a child and designating a residential parent and legal custodian of the child, including a temporary order, is issued resulting from an action of divorce, alimony, annulment, or dissolution of marriage, and the order or decree pertains to a child who is a pupil in a public or nonpublic school, the residential parent of the child shall notify the school of those allocations and designations by providing the person in charge of admission at the pupil's school with a certified copy of the order or decree that made the allocation and designation. Whenever there is a modification of any order or decree allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of a child and designating a residential parent and legal custodian of the child that has been submitted to a school, the residential parent shall provide the person in charge of admission at the pupil's school with a certified copy of the order or decree that makes the modification. (2) Whenever a power of attorney is executed under sections 3109.51 to 3109.62 of the Revised Code that pertains to a child who is a pupil in a public or nonpublic school, the attorney in fact shall notify the school of the power of attorney by providing the person in charge of admission with a copy of the power of attorney. Whenever a caretaker authorization affidavit is executed under sections 3109.64 3109.65 to 3109.73 of the Revised Code that pertains to a child who is in a public or nonpublic school, the grandparent kinship caregiver who executed the affidavit shall notify the school of the affidavit by providing the person in charge of admission with a copy of the affidavit. (C) If, at the time of a pupil's initial entry to a public or nonpublic school, the pupil is under the care of a shelter for victims of domestic violence, as defined in section 3113.33 of the Revised Code, the pupil or the pupil's parent shall notify the school of that fact. Upon being so informed, the school shall inform the elementary or secondary school from which it requests the pupil's records of that fact. (D) Whenever a public or nonpublic school is notified by a law enforcement agency pursuant to division (D) of section 2901.30 of the Revised Code that a missing child report has been filed regarding a pupil who is currently or was previously enrolled in the school, the person in charge of admission at the school shall mark that pupil's records in such a manner that whenever a copy of or information regarding the records is requested, any school official responding to the request is alerted to the fact that the records are those of a missing child. Upon any request for a copy of or information regarding a pupil's records that have been so marked, the person in charge of admission immediately shall report the request to the law enforcement agency that notified the school that the pupil is a missing child. When forwarding a copy of or information from the pupil's records in response to a request, the person in charge of admission shall do so in such a way that the receiving district or school would be unable to discern that the pupil's records are marked pursuant to this division but shall retain the mark in the pupil's records until notified that the pupil is no longer a missing child. Upon notification by a law enforcement agency that a pupil is no longer a missing child, the person in charge of admission shall remove the mark from the pupil's records in such a way that if the records were forwarded to another district or school, the receiving district or school would be unable to discern that the records were ever marked. (E) As used in this section: (1) "Protected child" means a child placed in a foster home, as that term is defined in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code, or in a residential facility. (2) "Residential facility" means a group home for children, children's crisis care facility, children's residential center, residential parenting facility that provides twenty-four-hour child care, county children's home, or district children's home. Section 2. That existing sections 3109.51, 3109.52, 3109.53, 3109.54, 3109.57, 3109.59, 3109.60, 3109.65, 3109.66, 3109.67, 3109.69, 3109.70, 3109.71, 3109.74, 3109.76, 3310.41, 3310.51, 3313.64, 3313.649, and 3313.672 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.